North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-52.1 Uniform Group Insurance Program
54-52.1-04.3.
Self-insurance health plan — Reserve fund — Continuing appropriation — Benefits — Insurance commissioner.

Pursuant to chapter 26.1-36.6, the board shall establish and maintain under a self-insurance health plan a reserve fund to provide for adverse fluctuations in future charges, claims, costs, or expenses of the uniform group insurance program. Upon the initial changeover from a contract for insurance pursuant to section 54-52.1-04 or a health maintenance organization pursuant to section 54-52.1-04.1 to a self-insurance health plan pursuant to section 54-52.1-04.2, the board must have a plan in place which is reasonably calculated to meet within sixty months of the changeover the funding requirements of chapter 26.1-36.6. All moneys in the reserve fund, not otherwise appropriated, are appropriated to the board for the payment of claims and other costs of the uniform group insurance program during periods of adverse claims or cost fluctuations.

A self-insurance health plan must comply with section 26.1-36.6-03 and must provide the same benefits required of a fully insured plan.

The insurance commissioner shall ensure compliance with and enforce the provisions of this section pursuant to chapter 26.1-36.6.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 677, § 2; S.L. 1991, ch. 600, § 14; 2011, ch. 433, § 4; 2019, ch. 462, § 6, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-04.4.
Insurance to cover mammogram examinations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 367, § 2; 1999, ch. 267, § 2; repealed by 2019, ch. 462, § 10, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-04.5.
Insurance to cover involuntary complications of pregnancy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 368, § 2; repealed by 2019, ch. 462, § 10, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-04.6.
Coverage for treatment of certain disorders. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 369, § 2; 1995, ch. 290, § 2; repealed by 2019, ch. 462, § 10, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-04.7.
Uniform group insurance program — Vision and dental plans.

The board may establish a dental plan, a vision plan, or both, for eligible employees. The board shall receive bids for the plan or plans pursuant to section 54-52.1-04. The board may reject any or all bids and provide a plan of self-insurance. Premiums for this coverage must be paid by the eligible employee. Any refund, rebate, dividend, experience rating allowance, discount, or other reduction of premium must be credited as provided by section 54-52.1-06.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 533, § 3.

54-52.1-04.8.
Uniform group insurance program — Long-term care plan.

The board may establish a long-term care plan for eligible employees. The board shall receive bids for the plan under section 54-52.1-04. The board may reject any or all bids and provide a plan of self-insurance. Premiums for this plan must be paid by the eligible employee. Any refund, rebate, dividend, experience rating allowance, discount, or other reduction of premium must be credited as provided by section 54-52.1-06.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 533, § 4.

54-52.1-04.9.
Uniform group insurance program — Employee assistance program.

The board shall establish an employee assistance program available to persons in the medical and hospital benefits coverage group. The premium for this coverage must be paid as provided by section 54-52.1-06. The board shall receive bids for this program under section 54-52.1-04. Each department, board, or agency shall obtain employee assistance program services through the board for eligible employees and may not enter into any agreement to obtain employee assistance program services with a third-party provider except that a department, board, or agency may use its own employee assistance program services to the extent such services are provided by personnel of that department, board, or agency. As used in this section, “employee assistance program” means an employer-sponsored service for employees under which a professional employee assistance program staff assists employees and their families in finding help for emotional, drug, alcohol, family, health, and other personal or job-related problems that may be affecting their work performance.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 533, § 5; 1997, ch. 467, § 2.

54-52.1-04.10.
Insurance to cover dental anesthesia and hospitalization. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 269, § 2; repealed by 2019, ch. 462, § 10, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-04.11.
Insurance to cover foods and food products for inherited metabolic diseases. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 268, § 2; repealed by 2019, ch. 462, § 10, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-04.12.
Insurance to cover medical services related to intoxication. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 256, § 4; repealed by 2019, ch. 462, § 10, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-04.13.
Coverage of telehealth services. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 425, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 219, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; repealed by 2019, ch. 462, § 10, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-04.14.
Coverage of cancer treatment medications. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2015, ch. 218, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; repealed by 2019, ch. 462, § 10, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-04.15.
Health insurance benefits coverage — Prescription drug coverage — Transparency — Audits — Confidentiality.

If the prescription drug coverage component of a health insurance benefits coverage contract received in response to a request for bids under section 54-52.1-04 utilizes the services of a pharmacy benefits manager, either contracted directly with a pharmacy benefits manager or indirectly through the health insurer, in addition to the factors set forth under section 54-52.1-04 the board shall consider and give preference to an insurer’s contract that:

Provides the board or the board’s auditor with a copy of the insurer’s current contract with the pharmacy benefits management company which controls the prescriptions drug coverage offered as part of the health insurance benefits coverage, and if the contract is revised or a new contract is entered, requires the insurer to provide the board with the revision or new contract within thirty days of the change.

Provides the board with monthly claims data and information on all programs being implemented or modified, including prior authorization, step therapy, mandatory use of generic drugs, or quantity limits.

Describes the extent to which the board may customize the benefit plan design, including copayments, coinsurance, deductibles, and out-of-pocket limits; the drugs that are covered; the formulary; and the member programs implemented.

Describes the audit rights of the board.

The board may conduct annual audits to the extent permitted under the contract terms agreed to under subsection 1. The audits must include:

A review of a complete set of electronic prescription coverage claims data reflecting all submitted claims, including information fields identified by the board.

A review of a list of all programs that have been implemented or modified during the audit period under subsection 1, and in connection with each program the auditor shall report on the cost, the cost savings or avoidance, member disruption, the process for and number of overrides or approvals and disapprovals, and clinical outcomes.

Recommendations for proposed changes to the prescription drug benefit programs to decrease costs and improve plan beneficiaries’ health care treatment.

Information provided to the board under the contract provisions required under this section are confidential; however, the board may disclose the information to retained experts and the information retains its confidential status in the possession of these experts.

The board may retain an auditor of the board’s choice which is not a competitor of the pharmacy benefits manager; a pharmaceutical manufacturer representative; or any retail, mail, or specialty drug pharmacy representative or vendor.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 378, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

54-52.1-04.16.
Prescription drug coverage — Performance audits.

Except for Medicare part D, prescription drug coverage, the board may not enter or renew a contract for prescription drug coverage unless the contract authorizes the board during the term of the contract to conduct a performance audit of the prescription drug coverage and any related pharmacy benefits management services. The contract must provide:

The board must have full access to data regarding:

The total dollars paid to the pharmacy benefits manager by the carrier and the board;

The total amount of dollars paid to the pharmacy benefits manager by the carrier which were not subsequently paid to a licensed pharmacy in the state; and

Payments made to all pharmacy providers.

The board must have full access to data regarding the average reimbursement, by drug ingredient cost, dispensing fee, and any other fee paid by a pharmacy benefits manager to licensed pharmacies with which the pharmacy benefits manager shares common ownership or control or is affiliated.

The board must have full access to data regarding the average reimbursement, by drug ingredient cost, dispensing fee, and any other fee paid by a pharmacy benefits manager to pharmacies licensed in the state.

The board must have full access to data regarding any direct and indirect fees, charges, or recoupment, or any kind of assessments imposed by the pharmacy benefits manager on pharmacies licensed with which the pharmacy benefits manager shares common ownership or control or is affiliated.

The board must have full access to data regarding any direct and indirect fees, charges, or recoupment, or any kind of assessments imposed by the pharmacy benefits manager, on pharmacies licensed in the state.

The contract must provide that all drug rebates, financial incentives, fees, and discounts must be disclosed to the board.

The board shall use an independent auditor who has no conflict of interest with the carrier, pharmacy benefits manager, or board. The board's auditor, the insurance department, and the employee benefits programs committee may access any information the board may access under this section. All information accessed by the board, board's auditor, insurance department, or employee benefits programs committee which is trade secret is a confidential record. This subsection does not limit the information required to be disclosed to the board under subsection 1.

Except for Medicare part D, if the board contracts directly with a pharmacy benefits manager or provides prescription drug coverage through a self-insurance plan, the contract must provide the pharmacy benefits manager shall disclose to the board and the board’s auditor all rebates and any other fees that provide the pharmacy benefits manager with sources of income under the contract, including under related contracts the pharmacy benefits manager has with third parties, such as drug manufacturers.

Anything the board has access to under this section, the insurance department and employee benefits programs committee has access to.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 464, § 2, effective March 7, 2019; 2021, ch. 442, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 464, S.L. 2019 provides, “

APPLICATION.

Section 2 of this Act applies to contracts entered by the public employees retirement system board on and after the effective date of this Act.”

54-52.1-04.17.
Self-insurance health plan — Bank of North Dakota line of credit — Continuing appropriation.

The Bank of North Dakota shall extend to the board a line of credit not to exceed fifty million dollars. The board shall repay the line of credit from health insurance premium revenue or repay the line of credit from other funds appropriated by the legislative assembly. The board may access the line of credit to the extent necessary to provide adequate claims payment funds, to purchase stop-loss coverage, and to defray other expenditures of administration of the self-insurance health plan. All loan funds received by the board from the Bank under this section, not otherwise appropriated, are appropriated to the board for the repayment of claims and other costs of the uniform group insurance program.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 462, § 7, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-05.
Provisions of contract — Term of contract.

Each uniform group insurance contract entered by the board must be consistent with the provisions of this chapter, must be signed for the state of North Dakota by the chairman of the board, and must include the following:

As many optional coverages as deemed feasible and advantageous by the board.

A detailed statement of benefits offered, including maximum limitations and exclusions, and such other provisions as the board may deem necessary or desirable.

The initial term or the renewal term of a uniform group insurance contract through a contract for insurance, health maintenance organization, or self-insurance health plan for hospital benefits coverage, medical benefits coverage, or prescription drug benefits coverage may not exceed two years.

The board may renew a contract subject to this subsection without soliciting a bid under section 54-52.1-04 if the board determines the carrier’s performance under the existing contract meets the board’s expectations, the proposed premium renewal amount does not exceed the board’s expectations, and renewal best serves the interests of the state and the state’s eligible employees.

In making a determination under this subsection, the board shall:

Use the services of a consultant to concurrently and independently prepare a renewal estimate the board shall consider in determining the reasonableness of the proposed premium renewal amount.

Review the carrier’s performance measures, including payment accuracy, claim processing time, member service center metrics, wellness or other special program participation levels, and any other measures the board determines relevant to making the determination and shall consider these measures in determining the board’s satisfaction with the carrier’s performance.

Consider any additional information the board determines relevant to making the determination.

The board may determine the carrier’s performance under the existing contract does not meet the board’s expectations, the proposed premium renewal amount exceeds the board’s expectations, or renewal does not best serve the interests of the state or the state’s eligible employees and the board therefore may decide to solicit a bid under section 54-52.1-04.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 517, § 5; 2015, ch. 56, § 6, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 462, § 8, effective March 7, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 56, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

54-52.1-05.1.
Health insurance benefits coverage — Insured and provider data disclosure.

Except as necessary for treatment, payment, or health care operations, a carrier providing health insurance benefits coverage under this chapter may not disclose identifiable or unidentifiable insured or provider data or information to a related or unrelated health care delivery entity. The board may establish exceptions to the disclosure limitations under this section for the limited purpose of addressing public interest and benefit activities; for the limited purpose of addressing research, public health, or health care operations; or for the solicitation of bids pursuant to section 54-52.1-04. An exception established by the board under this section may not be more permissive than allowed under state and federal privacy laws.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 56, § 7, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 443, § 1, effective April 13, 2021.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2015.

54-52.1-06.
State contribution — Penalty.

Each department, board, or agency shall pay to the board each month from its funds appropriated for payroll and salary amounts a state contribution in the amount as determined by the primary carrier of the group contract for the full single rate monthly premium for each of its eligible employees enrolled in the uniform group insurance program and the full rate monthly premium, in an amount equal to that contributed under the alternate family contract, including major medical coverage, for hospital and medical benefits coverage for spouses and dependent children of its eligible employees enrolled in the uniform group insurance program pursuant to section 54-52.1-07. The board then shall pay the necessary and proper premium amount for the uniform group insurance program to the proper carrier or carriers on a monthly basis.

Any refund, rebate, dividend, experience rating allowance, discount, or other reduction of premium amount must be credited at least annually to a separate fund of the uniform group insurance program to be used by the board to reimburse the administrative expense and benefit fund of the public employees retirement program for the costs of administration of the uniform group insurance program.

If an enrolled eligible employee is not entitled to receive salary, wages, or other compensation for a particular calendar month, that employee may make direct payment of the required premium to the board to continue the employee’s coverage, and the employing department, board, or agency shall provide for the giving of a timely notice to the employee of that employee’s right to make such payment at the time the right arises.

A governmental unit that fails to pay the contributions by the board’s established due date is subject to a civil penalty of fifty dollars and, as interest, one percent of the amount due for each month of delay or fraction of a month after the payment became due.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 517, § 6; 1973, ch. 434, § 1; 1973, ch. 435, § 1; 1979, ch. 576, § 1; 1983, ch. 580, § 3; 2001, ch. 496, § 5; 2021, ch. 438, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

54-52.1-06.1.
Uniform group insurance program benefits — Continuing appropriation.

The funds necessary to pay the consulting fees and health insurance benefits related to the uniform group insurance program are hereby appropriated from insurance premiums received by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 532, § 9.

54-52.1-07.
Optional coverage for employee’s family.

Each eligible employee enrolled in the uniform group insurance program may elect to include that person’s spouse and all qualified dependents, as provided for in the plan, within the hospital benefits coverage and medical benefits coverage, the state to pay the cost of such coverage as provided in section 54-52.1-06.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 517, § 7; 1979, ch. 576, § 2.

54-52.1-08.
Administration — Board to promulgate rules and regulations.

It is the responsibility of the board to account for and disburse premium payments, maintain records, prepare reports, and to perform such other functions as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The board may promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 517, § 8.

Cross-References.

Administration by board, see N.D.C.C. § 54-52-04.

54-52.1-08.1.
Administrative — Nondiscrimination testing for health and life insurance programs.

The board shall be responsible for the nondiscrimination testing required under section 89 of the Internal Revenue Code. The board may engage the services of a consultant to assist the board in its administration of this section. The various state departments, boards, agencies, and commissions shall provide the board with requested information so the board may carry out its duties under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 678, § 1.

54-52.1-08.2.
Uniform group insurance program — Compliance with federal requirements — Group purchasing arrangements.

If the board determines that any section or the phraseology of any section of this chapter does not comply with applicable federal statutes or rules, the board shall adopt appropriate terminology with respect to that section to comply with the federal statutes or rules, subject to the approval of the legislative management’s employee benefits programs committee. The board may assume responsibility for group purchasing arrangements as provided by federal law. Any plan modifications made by the board under this section are effective until the effective date of any measure enacted by the legislative assembly providing the necessary amendments to this chapter to ensure compliance with the federal statutes or rules.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 534, § 1; 2009, ch. 482, § 81.

54-52.1-09.
Reports.

Each department, board, or agency shall keep such records, make such certifications, and furnish the board or carriers with such information and reports as may be necessary to enable the board or carriers to carry out their functions under the provisions of this chapter. Carriers that have entered into a contract with the board are required to furnish such reasonable reports as the board determines to be necessary, and to permit the board to examine those records that relate to the uniform group insurance program.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 517, § 9.

54-52.1-09.1.
Health insurance utilization reports.

Upon request by a political subdivision that receives benefits under the uniform group insurance program, the board shall provide that political subdivision with a health insurance utilization report that is substantively the same as a report required under subsection 1 of section 26.1-36.4-09. The board shall provide the report in a manner that is in compliance with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 [Pub. L. 104-191; 110 Stat. 1936; 29 U.S.C. 1181 et seq.].

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 443, § 2, effective April 13, 2021.

54-52.1-10.
Exemption from state premium tax.

All premiums, consideration for annuities, policy fees, and membership fees collected under this chapter are exempt from the tax payable pursuant to section 26.1-03-17.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 517, § 10; 1983, ch. 319, § 34.

54-52.1-11.
Confidentiality of employee records.

In addition to the confidentiality requirements in section 26.1-36-12.4, information pertaining to an eligible employee’s group medical records for claims, employee premium payments made, salary reduction amounts taken, history of any available insurance coverage purchased, and amounts and types of insurance applied for under the supplemental life insurance coverage under this chapter is confidential and is not a public record. The information and records may be disclosed, under rules adopted by the board, only to:

A person to which the eligible employee has given written authorization to have the information disclosed.

A person legally representing the eligible employee, upon proper proof of representation, and unless the eligible employee specifically withholds authorization.

A person authorized by a court order.

A person to which the board is required to disclose information pursuant to federal or state statutes or regulations.

Any person if the purpose of the disclosure is for treatment, payment, or health care operations.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 224, § 4; 2001, ch. 496, § 6; 2003, ch. 499, § 5; 2019, ch. 462, § 9, effective March 7, 2019.

54-52.1-12.
Ownership and confidentiality of the uniform group health insurance medical records of employees, retirees, and dependents.

The medical records and related data of the employees, retirees, and dependents, obtained as the result of enrollment in the uniform group insurance program, are the property of the public employees retirement system. The records and data are confidential and are not public records. However, the board may allow administrators of administrative services only contracts or third-party administrators contracts access to the records and data where it is required in the performance of the administrator’s duties pursuant to the contract. No administrator may be held liable for furnishing to the board information with respect to any patient, or any physician, hospital, or other health care provider.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 23, § 3.

54-52.1-13.
Uniform prescription drug cards.

The board shall provide for issuance of uniform prescription drug cards under a contract for insurance pursuant to section 54-52.1-04 or under a self-insurance plan pursuant to section 54-52.1-04.2 in the same manner as provided under section 26.1-36-43.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 275, § 2.

54-52.1-14.
Wellness program.

The board shall develop an employer-based wellness program. The program must encourage employers to adopt a board-developed wellness program by either charging extra health insurance premium to nonparticipating employers or reducing premium for participating employers.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 499, § 4.

54-52.1-15.
Acceptance and expenditure of third-party payments — Continuing appropriation.

The board may receive moneys from third parties, including the federal government, pursuant to one or more federal programs. Any money received from a third party by the board is appropriated to the board on a continuing basis for the board’s use in paying benefits, premiums, or administrative expenses under the uniform group insurance program.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 531, § 14.

54-52.1-16.
Uniform group insurance program — Collaborative drug therapy program — Continuing appropriation.

The board may establish a collaborative drug therapy program available to individuals in the medical and hospital benefits coverage group. The purpose of the collaborative drug therapy program is to improve the health of individuals in identified health populations and to manage health care expenditures.

Under the program, the board may involve physicians, pharmacists, and other health professionals to coordinate health care for individuals in identified health populations in order to improve health outcomes and reduce spending on care for the identified health problem. Under the program, pharmacists and other health professionals may be reimbursed for providing face-to-face collaborative drug therapy services to covered individuals in the identified health population. To encourage enrollment in the plan, the board may provide incentives to covered individuals in the identified health population which may include waived or reduced copayment for related treatment drugs and supplies.

The board may request the assistance of the North Dakota pharmacists association or a specified delegate to implement a formalized disease management program with the approval of the prescriptive practices committee established in section 43-15-31.4, which must serve to standardize chronic disease care and improve patient outcomes. This program must facilitate enrollment procedures, provide standards of care, enable consistent documentation of clinical and economic outcomes, and structure an outcomes reporting system.

The board may seek and accept private contributions, gifts, and grants-in-aid from the federal government, private industry, and other sources for a collaborative drug therapy program for identified health populations. Any funds that may become available through contributions, gifts, grants-in-aid, or other sources to the board for a collaborative drug therapy program are appropriated to the board on a continuing basis.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 487, § 1.

54-52.1-17.
Uniform group insurance program — Collaborative drug therapy program — Funding.

The board shall establish a collaborative drug therapy program that is to be available to individuals in the medical and hospital benefits coverage group. The purpose of the collaborative drug therapy program is to improve the health of individuals with diabetes and to manage health care expenditures.

The board shall involve physicians, pharmacists, and certified diabetes educators to coordinate health care for covered individuals with diabetes in order to improve health outcomes and reduce spending on diabetes care. Under the program, pharmacists and certified diabetes educators may be reimbursed for providing face-to-face collaborative drug therapy services to covered individuals with diabetes. To encourage enrollment in the plan, the board shall provide incentives to covered individuals who have diabetes which may include waived or reduced copayment for diabetes treatment drugs and supplies.

The North Dakota pharmacists association or a specified delegate shall implement a formalized diabetes management program with the approval of the prescriptive practices committee established in section 43-15-31.4, which must serve to standardize diabetes care and improve patient outcomes. This program must facilitate enrollment procedures, provide standards of diabetes care, enable consistent documentation of clinical and economic outcomes, and structure an outcomes reporting system.

The board shall fund the program from any available funds in the uniform group insurance program and if necessary the fund may add up to a two dollar per month charge on the policy premium for medical and hospital benefits coverage. A state agency shall pay any additional premium from the agency’s existing appropriation.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 488. § 1.

54-52.1-18.
High-deductible health plan alternative with health savings account option.

The board shall develop and implement a high-deductible health plan as an alternative to the plan under section 54-52.1-02. The high-deductible health plan alternative with a health savings account must be made available to state employees by January 1, 2012. After June 30, 2015, at the board’s discretion, the high-deductible health plan alternative may be offered to political subdivisions for coverage of political subdivision employees. If a political subdivision elects this high-deductible option the political subdivision may not offer the plan under section 54-52.1-02.

Health savings account fees for participating state employees must be paid by the employer.

Except as provided in subdivision b, subject to the limits of section 223(b) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 223(b)], the difference between the cost of the single and family premium for eligible state employees under section 54-52.1-06 and the premium for those employees electing to participate under the high-deductible health plan under this section must be deposited in a health savings account for the benefit of each participating employee.

If the public employees retirement system is unable to establish a health savings account due to the employee’s ineligibility under federal or state law or due to failure of the employee to provide necessary information in order to establish the account, the system is not responsible for depositing the health savings account contribution. The member will remain a participant in the high-deductible health plan regardless of whether a health savings account is established.

If a member closes the health savings account established for that member under this section, the system is not responsible for depositing the health savings account contribution after that closure.

Each new state employee must be provided the opportunity to elect the high-deductible health plan alternative. At least once each biennium, the board shall provide an open enrollment period allowing existing state employees or a political subdivision to change their coverage.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 434, § 1; 2013, ch. 434, § 3; 2015, ch. 259, § 13, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 372, § 8, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 259, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 434, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.